West Virginia, session 2026, HB5532.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 5. Prohibition of double taxation of residential rental properties. §11A-5-1. Purpose. The Legislature finds that lowering rent for residential tenants is a priority and finds that landlords can only keep the cost of rental properties affordable if these properties are not double-taxed by counties or municipalities. §11A-5-2. Taxation on rental properties by counties and municipalities. (a) All taxes assessed against owners of residential rental properties by a county or municipality must be at the same rate as if the rental property were owner-occupied housing.(b) No county or municipality may assess any additional property taxes on residential rental properties based on zoning.(c) This article in no way alters the assessment of sales and service taxes for business under §11-15-1 et seq. of this code. §11A-5-3. Promulgation of rules. The commission may make such rules as it considers necessary to carry out the provisions of this article, which rules shall include procedures for changes to the assessments of real property and the forms that will classify properties for future reporting. The commission shall file a copy of any rule so exempted from the provisions of chapter 29-A of this code with the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee created pursuant to §29A-3-11 of this code prior to October 31, 2026.